Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 11. Merger, Share Exchange, Consolidation and Conversion

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

19 Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 2152 to 2347.

Duty of corporate directors to exercise “informed” judgment in recommending responses to merger or tender offers, 46 ALR4th 887.

“Golden parachute” defense to hostile corporate takeover, 66 ALR4th 138.

Lockup option defense to hostile corporate takeover, 66 ALR4th 180.

Causation in private civil actions by minority shareholders under proxy provisions of § 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USCS § 78n(a)) and Securities Exchange Act (SEC) Rules thereunder — post Virginia Bankshares, 137 ALR Fed 293.

19 C.J.S. Corporations §§ 792 to 810.